Utah statutes.
79-3-502.   Permit required to excavate critical paleontological resources on school and institutional trust lands -- Removal of specimen or site.

(1) (a)  Before excavating for critical paleontological resources on school or institutional trust lands, a person must obtain a permit from the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration.

(b)  The School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration may, by rule, delegate the authority to issue excavation permits for critical paleontological resources to the survey.

(c)  Application for a permit shall be made on a form furnished by the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration.

(d)  Prior to issuing a permit, the school and institutional trust lands administration shall consult with the survey director, or assigned staff, pursuant to Section 79-3-508.

(e)  The School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration shall enact rules for the issuance of permits specifying or requiring:

(i)  the minimum permittee qualifications;

(ii)  the duration of the permit;

(iii)  the need, if any, to submit data obtained in the course of field investigations to the administration;

(iv)  proof of consultation with the designated museum representative regarding curation of collections; and

(v)  other information the School and Institutional  Trust Lands Administration considers necessary.

(2)  A person may not remove from the state, prior to placement in a repository or curation facility, a specimen, site, or portion of a specimen or site from school and institutional trust lands without permission from the School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration, granted after consultation with the survey.

